Summary
"With a traditional layout, The Trusdale is a 4 bedroom home perfect for families in need of extra space."
"A rare opportunity to buy the FREEHOLD of two blocks comprising a total of ELEVEN APARTMENTS. Close to Canterbury City and train station, the properties include NINE FULLY LET apartments offering a great yearly income and two privately owned apartments with leaseholds."
"Bairstow Eves are delighted to offer for sale this exceptional new build five bedroom detached family home with triple detached garage and views over Kentish orchards to the rear. Currently under construction, this fantastic residence is due to be completed in 2023. The house off..."
*COMING SOON* An outstanding 5 bedroom family house with triple detached garage and views over Kentish orchards to the rear.
"One of Canterbury’s finest and historically important Georgian houses, lovingly and sympathetically restored with integrity and style, and offering superb family accommodation"
"Steeped in history, this fascinating Grade ID listed detached house was transformed by the current owners in 2015. With a stylish, modern high end finish and incredible attention to detail, it truly is one of the most awe-inspiring and uniqueness family homes you will see."
"A large and well presented family home, built for modern living and located in a desirable area between the city of Canterbury and village of Littlebourne.The accommodation consists of porch, entrance hall, shower room and study/home office."
"Description Orwell, is a substantial detached house which sits proud within just under an acre plot and is set back off the main road, the property we believe dates from 1936 and was named Orwell, after a famous Golden-haired colt race horse, who won the 2000 Guineas at Newmarket in 1932. "
Located in the sought after Canterbury city centre this is a unique opportunity to purchase a home and additional investment opportunity all in one!
"A substantial detached Neo-Georgian style modern family home situated in one of Canterbury’s most sought-after locations, within a short walk of Canterbury West railway station and the city centre."
"Guide Price £1,000,000 - £1,100,000. Fantastic investment opportunity to own this 8 bedroom freehold rental property that includes The Longport Cafe. Prime central location with awe inspiring views of the Cathedral"
"A substantial detached house occupying a generous plot of approximately 0.35 of an acre, with a frontage to Puckle Lane of 111 ft (38.83m) and an overall depth of 181 ft (55.17m). ‘Augusten’ is ideally positioned moments from the City centre, which offers an excellent range of shopping..."
"A striking and sympathetically styled contemporary home, built to an exceptional standard by Millwood Designer Homes and set within a generous plot of 0.18 acres in the highly exclusive Polo Field Drive development, between Canterbury and Littlebourne village. The property was constru (cont.)"
Virtual tour: A stylish Grade II Listed townhouse with good access to the river and city centre
A fantastic residential development opportunity within walking distance of Canterbury's City Centre and University. The commercial property benefits from an issued consent to convert into 6 residential units under permitted development rights
"Bairstow Eves are privileged to bring to open market the most exquisite five bedroom detached home nestled within the most glorious farmstead setting, surrounded by wonderful orchards and countryside on the outskirts of the historic city of Canterbury. Exuding charm and elegance, this..."
"An exquisite Georgian residence in the desirable village of Harbledown, within walking distance to Canterbury West Station and the City Centre. Sold with no forward chain, this grade two listed townhouse exhibits stunning period features throughout and offers four generous double bedrooms. NO CHAIN."
Virtual tour: A beautiful Grade ll Listed property with wonderful riverside views close to Canterbury West station
"Ideally located for the shops, amenities and train station with high speed links to London, is this newly refurbished Grade II listed terraced house. Combining modern and period features it is a luxurious city centre home."
"Virtual tour - An elegant Grade II Listed Georgian townhouse, set in a prime position just moments from Canterbury city centre and Canterbury West station."
A very well presented 5 bedroom detached family home with bright and spacious rooms situated in the sought-after Puckle Lane just half a mile from the city centre. •5 Bedroom Detached Family Home •Bright & Spacious Accommodation •Well Presented Throughout •2 Bathrooms •...
Built in the late 1980's this attractive home would be perfect for families with its spacious accommodation throughout and driveway parking.
"The property is situated within a quiet location in the popular St Stephens area of Canterbury, this unique spacious five-bedroom detached house has been converted to give a very generous space for a growing/large family."
"Guide Price £750,000 - £800,000. Virtual tour available - An elegant Grade II listed townhouse within Canterbury’s historic city wall, with flexible accommodation."
"This sumptuous and sizeable family home is ready to move straight into. New double-glazed windows throughout, a new boiler and central heating system, new flooring and a new bathroom with UFH, and solar electric, all contribute to a perfectly presented property with Cathedral views. The location ..."
*IDEAL FAMILY HOME CLOSE TO CITY CENTRE*Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom semi detached family home with driveway parking and enclosed rear garden.Located in a popular residential cul de sac just off St.
"Guide Price £475,000 - £500,000. Superb location for Canterbury city centre with excellent opportunity to extend further. With garage providing sought after off road parking just 0.2 miles to Whitefriars Shopping Centre"
"* Guide Price £750,000 - £800,000 * Mann Estate Agents are delighted to bring to market this fantastic Executive family home to the market in a desirable Homersham location. Situated on a generous corner plot with a beautifully landscaped front and rear garden, ..."
A beautifully presented four bedroom detached house set in the popular location of The Mount.
"A four bedroom detached, executive home with spacious accommodation and cathedral views, making the perfect family home."
"Bairstow Eves are privileged to bring to the open market a stunning FIVE bedroom detached home in the ever so desirable road of Hillview Road, North Canterbury. This ideal family home has extensive living accommodation and must be viewed to appreciate the wealth of accommodation throughout. The r..."
"This very generous six bedroom detached house is in a desirable location, close to Canterburys vibrant city centre, with an excellent choice of schools, local amenities, leisure facilities and transport links making it the perfect family home."
"Located on a gated development, this delightful modern terraced house was finished in 2019 to a high specification. Thoughfully designed to reflect the impressive location, with a rear terrace backing onto the grounds of the historic St Johns Hospital."
"A handsome semi-detached period house offering comprehensive and versatile accommodation of elegant proportions. On the ground floor there is an attractive entrance hall with impressive staircase, two original reception rooms, a well fitted kitchen/breakfast room and a useful utility room to the..."
A bright and spacious detached family home with four/five bedrooms situated in popular Nunnery Fields on the sought-after South side of the city offered for sale with NO CHAIN. The property has been tastefully decorated and greatly modernised in recent years to include all new bathrooms...
"Situated in an elegant residential street yet close to the town centre, this handsome Grade II listed Georgian townhouse is perfectly placed to enjoy all that Canterbury has to offer. Situated over four floors, this property has been strikingly renovated by the current owners and conveys a fresh,..."
"Three bedroom detached house, situated a stones throw from the city with local shops, schools and transport links on the doorstep."
A beautifully presented Edwardian property set over three floors with an attractive kerb side appeal in this popular area South of Canterbury City Centre and within walking distance of mainline railway stations
"Five bedroom detached executive style home in Ealham Close, Canterbury.A very popular South Canterbury location a short distance to the city centre, two grammar schools and the hospital, this family home has so much to offer."
"Three-bedroom detached bungalow in Abbots Barton Walk, Canterbury.A substantial home occupying an impressive plot with ample off-street parking, garaging and just a short stroll into the city centre."
"Mann Estate Agents are delighted to welcome this three double-bedroom detached bungalow for sale in the very desirable location of Abbots Barton Walk, Canterbury. Situated on a generous plot surrounded by a landscaped mature garden, this bungalow offers plenty of potential and versatile accommoda..."
"A well-located detached family house having undergone rear extension and reconfiguration works to provide extensive and versatile accommodation. On the ground floor is impressive open-plan living accommodation featuring a large kitchen/breakfast room, with solidtimber worksurfaces, which adjoins ..."
"** SIX BEDROOM 1930'S DETACHED HOUSE IN WEST CANTERBURY ** WALKING DISTANCE TO CANTERBURY WEST STATION, UNIVERSITY OF KENT & ST DUNSTAN'S ** LARGE FAMILY KITCHEN & TWO RECEPTION ROOMS ** TWO BATHROOMS WITH A SHOWER ** LARGE MATURE REAR GARDEN AND DRIVEWAY PARKING ** VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED **"
Rochester Avenue is a highly sought after position being just under a mile from the City Centre.
"* Guide Price £600,000 - £650,000 * Mann Estate Agents are delighted to welcome this three double-bedroom detached bungalow for sale in the very desirable location of Cherry Avenue, Canterbury. Situated on a generous plot surrounded by a landscaped mature garden, this 1920'..."
"Guide Price £600,000 - £650,000. Fantastic 4 bed family home located in the highly desirable Harkness Drive. Spacious living/dining room & country style kitchen. 3 double bedrooms, 1 single plus family bathroom. Private rear garden. Detached garage & driveway parking. No onward chain."
"Four bedroom detached home in Kings Park, Canterbury.Tucked away in small leafy development close to the city centre and a short walk to the train station with high speed links to London, Kings Park is a highly desirable location."
"Having recently been extended and renovated to a high standard, this is an attractive 1930’s five bedroom semi-detached family home ready to move into, providing a wonderful modern space with versatile accommodation. Arranged over three floors this property has been cleverly designed retai..."
"Spacious detached four bedroom home, built in the 1970's with driveway parking and a quiet cul-de-sac location."
"THIS FAMILY HOME PROVIDES PLENTY OF FLEXIBLE LIVING SPACE. The Avondale's generous open-plan kitchen has a dedicated dining area with an attractive bay window, and a SEPARATE UTILITY ROOM. A large TRIPLE-ASPECT LOUNGE leads to the garden via French doors and a separate study provides a quiet spac..."
"Are you a Key Worker, you could save up to £29,500! This family home provides plenty of flexible living space. The Avondale's generous open-plan kitchen has a dedicated dining area with an attractive bay window, and a separate utility room. A large triple-aspect lounge leads to the garden via Fre..."
** FOUR BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOUSE ** POPULAR CANTERBURY LOCATION ** LARGE OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/FAMILY ROOM ** LIVING ROOM WITH LOG BURNER ** TWO LUXURY BATHROOMS WITH WETROOM AND SAUNA ** UTILITY ROOM AND LOFT ROOM ** LARGE REAR GARDEN WITH DECKING **
"A very handsome 1930s bay-fronted semi-detached family home, located in a pleasant residential cul-de-sac in South Canterbury and offered to the market with no onward chain. The house is spacious throughout and sits comfortably within a large triangular-shaped plot giving scope to extend, su (cont.)"
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this rarely available detached home in a sought after, cul de sac location just off Old Dover Road."
A most impressive contemporary townhouse occupying a corner setting with a return frontage to Tannery Way South and Creine Mill Lane South. The property has undergone significant refurbishment works over recent years and is now beautifully presented with a high specification and exacting attentio...
"Recently Refurbished, Three Bedrooms, City Centre!"
"Connells offer this three bedroom, semi detached, family home set in a sought after location on the edge of Canterbury City. The property is set over four floors comprising open plan kitchen dining room with utility room, large lounge with bay window, family bathroom and en suite to master."
A fine example of a substantial Victorian townhouse close to central Canterbury on the South side of the city.
Looking for your next family home? Look no further. This extended four-bedroom detached home in the popular location of Wincheap has plenty to offer and comes to the market for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN.
"KEY WORKER? WE COULD CONTRIBUTE UP TO £28,500! The Bradgate is a beautifully presented three-bedroom home. Downstairs you can enjoy an open-plan kitchen/dining/family area with a large glass French doors letting in lots of natural lights and access to your garden. There is also a cosy lounge comp..."
"Situated in a desirable location on the South side of Canterbury city centre, this handsome semi-detached Victorian property offers accommodation over four floors and is offered with no onward chain. On the ground floor is an attractive tiled hallway with decorative arching, stairs rising to the ..."
"A SUPERB, SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY LOCATED IN ROUGH COMMON HAS BECOME AVAILABLE TO VIEW! Your Move are proud to offer this spacious property which is a true family home coupled with a superb location that will attract a lot of interest! An internal viewing is simply essential! EPC Grade D. "
"Your Move are proud to offer this superb semi detached family home. Wonderfully presented throughout, this character home offers the space and modern flourishes buyers demand from their property. This will gain a lot of interest, do not miss your chance to view! EPC Grade D."
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this superb three bedroom, period Victorian home, with two reception rooms and spacious accommodation."
"**IMMACULATE DETACHED HOUSE ** THREE BEDROOMS, THREE EN-SUITES ** GARAGE AND DRIVEWAY ** LARGE KITCHEN/DINER ** Bairstow eves are delighted to offer for sale this exquisite Art Deco-inspired three bedroom detached home at Saxon Fields. Built by Pentland Homes, who are renowned for buil..."
"A fantastic, large semi detached family home located in a popular Cul de Sac."
Exquisite three bedroom semi detached house with driveway in a sought after cul-de-sac in South Canterbury. This home is finished to the highest standard and is not to be missed!
A stunning rooftop purpose-built apartment set in the very heart of Canterbury City centre enjoying spectacular views of the Cathedral and over the City roofscape. The property provides spacious accommodation of impressive proportions and is attractively presented. There is a large dual aspect pr...
"An Ideal family home with three bedrooms and off street parking and is located a short walk from schools, shops, and the city centre. This home offers plenty of scope for development with its large side and rear gardens"
"This substantial, four bedroom, end of terrace home would make an ideal family home with flexible accommodation, off road parking for two cars, two bathrooms, beautifully presented gardens and within easy reach of local amenities and fast link to Lodon transport services."
Miles and Barr are delighted to present to the market this charming bay-fronted home dating back to the early 1900s.
The Hollinwood is a traditional family home. Inside the home is designed very much for a modern family life. An attractive glazed bay leading to the garden creates a light atmosphere in the open-plan kitchen with flexible dining and family space. The kitchen also has an adjacent utility room. The...
"This well presented, detached four bedroom bungalow is now available to the market. This spacious property can be viewed via Your Move for a new owner to love & enjoy. The current owner has enjoyed its size & position but now feels it is time to find a smaller property. Council tax band E"
"Beautifully presented family home situated within walking distance of Canterbury West Train station and the popular area of St Dunstans. Spacious Kitchen Diner | Party Room | Please Quote Ref JV0094. 
"
"Restorer’s Cottage, situated in a prime location within the city walls, is an attractive period home dating, we believe, around 1830, and having been updated and refurbished by the current owners, creating a charming characterful home. The property is arranged over three floors with an ope..."
"This handsome and generously proportioned period home sits along the cobbled streets of historic Canterbury inside the City Walls, and displays a wealth of characterful features. Timber beams, original fireplaces and an antique Victorian cast iron stove all give a nod to another era, but with com..."
"This pretty Victorian end terraced cottage, over three floors with versatile accommodation. Situated just a short walk to plenty of shops, supermarkets, primary schools, the city centre and transport links such as Canterbury East Station"
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £495,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £750,000"
"Stunning detached bungalow situated in a very desirable village of Broad Oak, Canterbury is beautifully presented throughout with modern fitted kitchen and bathroom suite, great size rear garden and ample of driveway parking. This three bedroom detached bungalow is simply stunning, both inside a..."
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this stunning three bedroom ground floor apartment, immaculately presented throughout with its own gated parking."
Picturesque double fronted period property totally refurbished and conveniently situated in the popular and vibrant St Dunstan's area of Canterbury.  
"Superb, large family home or investment opportunity."
"Offered with no onward chain, this spacious three bedroom, mid terracefamily home is set within Canterbury City walls and within walking distance of Canterbury City centre. The property is set over three floors. includes two bathrooms and downstairs cloakroom, allocated parking space and rear garden"
CHAIN FREE! Situated on the banks of the river Stour this beautiful town house with ample room for your family to grow and with a short walk of the amenities you could need
*Stunning family home located in a popular cul de sac*
"Bairstow Eves are delighted to offer for sale this six bedroom detached investment property with HMO licence. Accommodation comprises; Large entrance hall, spacious living room with french doors out to the garden. From the entrance hall you also have two good size bedrooms, utility roo..."
"** FLEXIBLE ACCOMMODATION ** INVESTMENT OR FAMILY HOME ** CURRENTLY LET AND HMO LICENCE IN PLACE ** Bairstow Eves are privileged to bring to the open market an exquisite semi-detached home built in 2006, set considerably back from the road and located in the highly sought after loc..."
"Chain Free! A prestigious second floor apartment in a prime position with fabulous views across the Dane John Gardens from both a living area, and an easily accessible balcony. Spacious throughout, the lounge measures over 20 feet, and the bedrooms are all nicely tucked away towards the rear of t..."
"A charming 1930`s home with a detached garage and attractive gardens. Located on Canterbury`s desirable south side, the property is walking distance to both Langton grammar schools, Kent & Canterbury Hospital and the cricket ground."
"Location, Location, Location!  Situated within the city of Canterbury''s ancient walls with views of the River Stour, Cathedral and the Marlowe Theatre!  This beautiful home was built circa 2013, only 60 seconds walk into the town centre and offers high quality fixtur..."
The Trusdale is a traditional double fronted 4 bedroom home perfect for families.
"A superb Grade II listed town house providing deceptively spacious accommodation over three floors with a wealth of charm and character. The property includes an elegant sitting room to the front, attractively fitted kitchen and conservatory to the rear overlooking and opening on to the garden. ..."
"Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the market this semi detached house in the popular location of St Stephens, Canterbury.A handsome bay fronted home in a popular area, the accommodation in brief consists of - ground floor entrance/hallway, two good sized reception rooms, the lounge has a l..."
"GUIDE PRICE £450,000 - £475,000 ** FLEXIBLE ACCOMMODATION ** INVESTMENT OR FAMILY HOME ** CURRENTLY LET AND HMO LICENCE IN PLACE ** Bairstow Eves are privileged to bring to the open market a substantial semi-detached home built in 2006, set considerably back from the ro..."
"A charming three bedroom terrace house with garage in a peaceful and sought-after location, close to the city centre and station "
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom cottage is situated within the heart of the city but set back from the high street, through a private gate, far enough to feel secluded from the thriving city centre."
Large town house on the popular Old Tannery Development with no onward chain.
‘Farmhouse Cottage` is an utterly charming grade two listed cottage with beautiful wrap-around gardens and off-road parking in desirable South Canterbury. Offered to the market with no forward chain.
"NO ONWARD CHAINMiles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom terrace home, with driveway parking for two cars and no onward chain."
Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the market this stylish four-bedroom townhouse set within the popular area of St Dunstan’s. Situated in the p...
"Guide Price £450,000 - £475,000. Beautifully presented Grade II Listed apartment - ready to move into - under half a mile from Whitefriars & Canterbury East station."
*IMMACULATE CONDITION THROUGHOUT!*Miles and Barr are delighted to be offering to the market this well presented and unique three bedroom terrace family home located just a stones throw away from Canterbury City Centre and within walking distance to Canterbury West.
"*** GUIDE PRICE £450,000 - £475,000 ***Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this graceful and alluring Edwardian home built in 1905, with a single garage to the rear and generous accommodation throughout."
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this three bedroom detached home in Salisbury Road, Canterbury.Occupying a spacious corner plot with ample off street parking with the correct permissions this home would be perfect to extend.The accommodation in brief consists of - entrance porch, open plan ..."
"Refurbished to an excellent standard, this stunning three bedroom semi detached property has The River Stour at the end of the garden and is just a stones throw away from the hustle and bustle of the city- It is an absolute must see. Whether you are searching for that exciting first home or are ..."
"Designed exclusively for the over 60s, developed by McCarthy & Stone, Freeman House is a stunning example of luxurious living with all the comforts and security one could wish for. The development offers a selection of 1 and 2 bedroom Retirement Living Apartments with a dedicated House M..."
"Mann Estate Agents are delighted to bring to market a spacious three bedroom detached house located on Salisbury Road, Canterbury. Situated on a generous corner plot, with a driveway to the front and rear plus space to apply for a double storey extension, making this an ideal family home. U..."
"Impressive detached two double bedroom house with good sized rear garden, garage, car barn and two parking spaces!"
A stunning contemporary two bedroom detached residence situated on an exclusive new development just outside of the Cathedral City of Canterbury. A striking exterior twinned with simple lines and minimalistic interior is the perfect combination for modern living. This particular plot (cont.)
The Huxford is a 4 bedroom home well-suited to families
"Situated in an attractive cul-de-sac location away from passing traffic yet with the convenience of a selection of retail amenities and countryside walks nearby, this thoughtfully extended and deceptively spacious four-bedroom home offers versatile and extensive accommodation. A good siz..."
"**ARE YOU AN INVESTOR LOOKING FOR THAT PERFECT STUDENT LET? OR A FAMILY LOOKING FOR THE NEXT FAMILY HOME? SITUATED CENTRALLY TO CANTERBURY, IS THIS PERFECT PROPERTY SET FOR BOTH!** Set in a prime location, is this Four Bedroom Semi-Detached Property that is perfectly set back from the road. Th..."
"Substantial bungalow with off road parking and garage, minutes walk from the city centre and major shops."
"* Guide Price £425,000 - £450,000 * Mann Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the open market a fine example of an extended detached property of which has been lovingly restored and situated in a desirable South Canterbury location. This beautiful Edwardian home has an ..."
"Extended, four bedroom, semi detached house in the sought after location of Rough Common with a driveway for several cars!"
"This quirky double fronted Grade II listed property with its distinctive facade, is situated in the heart of the city centre and just a short walk to both Canterbury East and West railway stations. The property has many period features and is lovely and light courtesy of having a dual aspect (cont.)"
"Situated in an ideal location just on the outskirts of Canterbury City Centre, this three double bedroom detached bungalow offers great potential for the new owner to put their own stamp on the property. As you enter the home you are greeted by a large entrance hall leading to the three double be..."
"A very attractive character semi detached house close to the historic city centre, Canterbury East train station, and with easy access to the A2. Plenty of charm and period features, with the potential to reconfigure further if so required (subject to obtaining the correct permission)."
"This generously proportioned three bedroom detached bungalow is positioned in a quiet cul-de-sac on the outskirts of Canterbury City Centre benefiting from light and airy accommodation incorporating entrance hall leading to the kitchen, lounge, dining room with doors to the conservatory and three..."
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer, for the first time ever to the market, this three bedroom detached bungalow in Hales Drive, Canterbury.A highly desirable spacious bungalow with lots of potential."
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this three bedroom semi detached home in Merton Lane, Canterbury.A former police house occupying a really good plot, this home has lapsed planning permission to develop a ground floor extension which would provide annex style accommodation.The accommodation i..."
"Chain Free! Situated in a favoured road just south of the city centre, this wonderful semi-detached home has rooms of great proportion throughout, parking along with an impressive double garage, and the potential for further improvement, subject to all relevant consents."
"Guide Price £290,000 - £310,000. Impressive first floor apartment within walking distance of the high street & Canterbury West train station. Stunning open plan living space, 2 double bedrooms & 2 bathrooms. Allocated parking & bike store."
A beautiful character home with parking to the rear! Your Move are delighted to offer this exciting buy that is in the heart of Canterbury. City life is on your doorstep! Call to arrange your viewing today! EPC Exempt. 
"This deceptively spacious four bedroom semi detached bungalow with loft conversion, is situated within a short walking distance of all town centre facilities and amenities."
"Chain Free! This charming period semi detached cottage displays a wealth of character features, including exposed beams and timber windows. A wonderful blend of new and old, underlined by spacious open plan living with double doors opening to a secluded walled garden with driveway."
"Set on the edge of Canterbury town, this plot of land is offered to the market as an ideal investment opportunity with pre planning advice development of 12 apartments. Access to the site is available via Warwick Road with the main site being located on Windmill Road."
A wonderful duplex apartment forming part of a prestigious gated development built by Rogate Homes in 2006. The apartments were designed to a very high specification and are situated in South Canterbury approximately half-a-mile from the city centre. The development benefits from beautifully (cont.)
"* Guide Price £400,000 - £425,000 * Mann Estate Agents are delighted to welcome this three storey townhouse in the very desirable location of New Street St. Dunstans. This home has versatile accommodation and an abundance of character and charm. On the ground fl..."
"*** Part of a short complete chain ***Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this four bedroom semi detached property in Rushmead Close, Canterbury.Having been extended this spacious home has so much potential for someone looking to put their own stamp on that next move."
**DETACHED TWO BEDROOM BUNGALOW**Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this two-bedroom detached bungalow in a secluded private drive with only two properties.
"PRICE RANGE £425,000- £475,000**NO ONWARD CHAIN**Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this executive style living accommodation in the heart of Canterbury's thriving city centre is this three bedroom FURNISHED duplex apartment."
"Miles & Barr are delighted to be offering this ""one of a kind"" three bedroom retirement apartment located in the desirable Deans Mill Court in central Canterbury and overlooking the River Stour."
Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the market this three/four bedroom terraced property on Station Road West in the busy City of Canterbury.
"*** Guide Price £400,000 - £425,000 ***Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this three bedroom semi detached home in New House Close Canterbury.A wonderful family home located in a quiet cul-de-sac with beautiful views and in a rural area on the edge of Canterbury, this home should be top of you..."
Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the market this three bedroom end of terrace property on Hanover Place.
A FABULOUS OPPORTUNITY TO ACQUIRE ONE OF CANTERBURY'S FINEST APARTMENTS ...
"Ideal for those in need of extra space, The Huxford offers 4 bedrooms and has been designed with growing families and couples in mind."
"Simply enchanting, this charming two bedroom property is found at the end of a tiny and almost hidden, gated pathway. Tucked away off the beaten track, yet lying in the heart of Canterbury, this charismatic home offers a private, quiet and secure retreat from the hustle and bustle of the City Cen..."
"Abode Sales & Lettings are delighted to offer this attractive four bedroom home, which would make an ideal family home or investment property. The accommodation comprises of a bright hallway leading to a well proportioned living room with a large bay window letting in an abundance of (cont.)"
"A spacious modern four bedroom family home located in a popular development to the South of the city centre and within walking distance of local shops, schools and amenities. The property is offered with no onward chain and, whilst requiring some cosmetic improvement, has light and generousl (cont.)"
"A bright two bedroom home, The Chilham has a stylish open-plan kitchen and dining area. French doors open out to the rear garden - creating the option for more living space in good weather. Upstairs you'll find the main bedroom comes complete with a stylish en suite. A single bedroom, study, and ..."
"A BRIGHT THREE BEDROOM HOME, The Archford has a stylish, OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN and dining area, with French doors opening out onto the rear garden - creating the option for even more living space in good weather.
A lobby separates the kitchen and the SPACIOUS LOUNGE, with stairs leading to the first ..."
"*WELL PRESENTED MODERN HOME CLOSE TO THE CITY CENTRE* Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom, double fronted terrace house, with en- suite bathroom and walk in wardrobe to the master bedroom."
"This beautifully presented three bedroom semi-detached home is located on the Homersham Development in Wincheap, which is situated within close proximity to the city centre and Canterbury East Train Station"
"GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £400,000 ** AMAZING VIEWS OVER HAMBROOK MARSHES** THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME WITH GARAGE ** Bairstow Eves are delighted to be offering to the market this three bedroom semi-detached home with countryside and river views. Set with..."
ATTENTION INVESTORS! Spacious end terrace property within the city walls with tenants in situ and tenants sourced for the next academic year!
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this beautiful presented three bedroom townhouse in the popular location of Realmwood Close, Canterbury.Situated just a short distance from the city centre and the local amenities the property is very well kept by the current owner."
Lovely Victorian house in a tucked away location with NO CHAIN
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this three/four bedroom Victorian end of terrace home in Pound Lane, Canterbury.A handsome property typical of the architecture of this area in the city, well maintained by the current owner, to the front decorative brickwork, the bay window and covered porch..."
"A striking detached contemporary two-bedroom spacious coach house mews with its own entrance, situated on an exclusive new development just outside of the Cathedral City of Canterbury. A smart exterior twinned with simple lines, excellent energy efficiency and minimalistic interior is the pe (cont.)"
"A handsome Grade II listed period house in an enviable setting within the City walls. It is close to the picturesque River Stour and within easy walking distance of central Canterbury, the Cathedral Precincts, The Marlowe Theatre and Canterbury West railway station. The property enjoys well propo..."
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this deceptively spacious three/ four bedroom end of terrace home, with a garage and sunny rear garden."
"Spacious , Three Bedroom Property with Off Road Parking and Cathedral Views!"
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom newly built home, with only one previous owner, this property provides modern living."
"Guide Price £375,000 to £425,000 Mann are delighted to bring to the open market this fantastic three-bedroom semi-detached family home in the sought after Rough Common Road, Canterbury. Upon entry you will find a welcoming entrance hallway, giving access to the k..."
"Your Move are proud to offer this wonderful apartment located within the city walls of Canterbury. It's 'hidden' rooftop location is found within the Whitefriars location of Canterbury and is on the doorstep of Canterbury's many shops, restaurants and transport. A location and home to be proud of..."
"A luxurious Penthouse apartment forming part of a prestigious development of 8 townhouses and 6 apartments, built in 2018 by highly respected local developers, Rogate. St Thomas Place is conveniently positioned within walking distance (0.5 miles) of the vibrant centre of this historic Cathedral C..."
NO CHAIN. Whether you are looking to put those exciting first steps on the property ladder or are search for a solid long term investment this four bedroom town house is a must see. At only 15 years old the property has been lovingly maintained and has a new kitchen and bathroom meaning you can ...
"Abode Sales & Lettings are delighted to offer this IDEAL INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY to the market, situated in one of the most desirable areas of the City, and a prime location for UKC students. Rushmead Close is in a quiet residential area just a short walk from St Dunstans, Canterbury (cont.)"
This attractive semi-detached bungalow is situated in the quiet cul-de-sac of Chaucer close. The city centre is a short distance away and there is also conveniently easy access onto the A2 in both directions. An ideal downsize that is ready to move straight into.
** NO ONWARD CHAIN**Miles & Barr are delighted to be offering this lovely three bedroom detached family home located in Green Cloth Mews and within walking distance to the city centre and Canterbury Christ Church University.
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN** Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom 1930's home located in a sought after residential location, close to University of Kent and the City Centre."
"ATTENTION INVESTORS - GENERATE INSTANT INCOME ON THIS TENANTED INVESTMENT PROPERTY! A fully licensed 6 bedroom property in a popular student neighbourhood in Canterbury, Kent. Enquire today."
Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom period home located within Canterbury's city walls in the ever popular King Street.
"A plot of land for sale, planning permission. Located in Broad Oak, Canterbury. Don't miss out call us today."
"Guide price £350,000 - £375,000. Wonderful 4 bedroom family home with versatile accommodation, set over 3 floors on the south side of Canterbury close to schools, the city centre & the hospital. 4 double bedrooms, kitchen/dining room, living room, 3 bathrooms, allocated parking & chain free."
"*** NO ONWARD CHAIN***Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the market this characterful, Grade II Listed Five Bedroom Semi Detached Property located in the popular area of Wincheap."
"Chain Free! This charming mid terrace property set in one of the most popular locations in Canterbury offers so much to potential buyers. The city centre is a short walk away for anybody who is looking to enjoy all Canterbury has to offer, along with the added benefit of the high speed train bein..."
** PLEASE NOTE THE GARDEN HAS BEEN SPLIT AND ONLY OFFERED TO THE FIRST FENCE LINE **Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this four bedroom 1930's semi-detached home situated in the city of Canterbury and within close proximity to all local amenities and transport links.
Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the market this beautiful three/four bedroom Terraced property situated in Somner Close.
Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom semi detached family home with spacious accommodation and off street parking.
"A stunning and immaculately-presented two double bedroom flat located in the heart of Canterbury City Centre, in a secure and private location and within walking distance to Canterbury West and East train stations and the City Centre."
"An excellent chain free home on a popular development located between the city of Canterbury and the coast. Spacious accommodation, driveway parking and a lovely rear garden, which rarely for a newer home isn't particularly overlooked."
"A superb three bedroom family home, located in a sought-after cul-de-sac just five minutes' walk from Canterbury West railway station and within easy reach of St Dunstans, the city centre and highly regarded primary and secondary schools. The property has sensibly arranged, well-proportioned (cont.)"
"Abode are pleased to offer for sale this well maintained 3 double bedroom property in the sought after location of St Michaels Place. The property comprises of a newly fitted, modern kitchen, downstairs cloakroom and utility area, large living room with a sunny aspect looking onto the ga (cont.)"
"A beautifully presented, gated, purpose built two bedroom apartment situated on the banks of the river Stour in a tucked away position in the heart of Canterbury City centre. This first floor apartment offers an entrance hall, beautifully appointed kitchen with white quartz worktops, m..."
"**SOLD VIA MODERN METHOD – BUYERS FEE’S APPLY** Bairstow Eves are delighted to bring to the open market this fantastic four bedroom semi-detached family home with off road parking and lovely sized rear garden. On entry, through the spacious porch, you are greet..."
"A highly specified two bedroom penthouse apartment, built by respected builders Rogate in 2006 and situated in a gated development within half a mile of the city centre. The property is beautifully designed and finished with spacious accommodation comprising a 20' living room, a circular stu (cont.)"
"Chain Free! This modern terraced house set across three floors, offers space for everyone with open plan living downstairs and generously sized bedrooms upstairs, one with en-suite. A private garden can be enjoyed at the rear, whilst a short walk will take you to the river Stour and scenic rivers..."
"Vacant , compact , 3 bedroom modern semi detached house tucked away from the main road , in a cul- de -sac just off Tudor Road in Wincheap . Local shops and industrial park close to hand with access to the City of Canterbury . Benefits from gas central heating and approx 3 year old double glaz..."
Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the market this end of terrace property situated in Edward Road.
"Believed to originally date back to the 14th and 15th Century, this centrally located Grade II listed property is probably one of the oldest cottages in Canterbury and retains many original features, giving an atmospheric charm.The property benefits from accommodation over three floors and has re..."
Charming end terrace cottage within walking distance of city centre with character features throughout and NO FORWARD CHAIN!
"Chain Free! Current layout is only suitable for investors wishing to purchase for use as a Home of Multiple Occupancy, subject to a Home of Multiple Occupancy licence being granted. The property boasts ample square footage and has potential to be converted back into a family home. The conservator..."
"Guide Price £325,000 - £350,000. A modern 3 bedroom 1st floor apartment close to the city centre with balcony & delightful river views. Open plan living room/kitchen, en-suite shower room to the main bedroom plus modern bathroom with shower over the bath & allocated parking for 1 car."
"Guide Price £325,000 - £350,000. Striking, modern 1st floor apartment with balcony & allocated parking within exclusive gated development. Located in prime position in the city centre with Canterbury West Station within easy distance.."
"Chain Free! Currently used as a student let, this attractive semi-detached character property in Albert Road offers great access to the city centre and train station, this would make an excellent investment or with some TLC a lovely family home."
"No Chain, Garage and Off Road Parking!"
"Are you looking for a family home with a large garden? If you are, look no further as Peepal Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this spacious three bedroom semi-detached property with large garden, open plan lounge/diner, and parking spaces at front."
"* Guide Price £325,000 - £375,000 * Mann Estate Agents are privileged to bring to the open market a beautiful, two-bedroom Grade II Listed cottage over three floors, with an abundance of character features and situated within the city walls of the historic city of Canterbur..."
"***Investment Opportunity or Family Home *** Martin and Co are delighted to offer this fantastic mid terraced three double bedroom property to the market with tenants in Situ until June 2024, an annual rental income of approx £1,400pcm and Council Tax Band C.
The property benefits from thre..."
"PRICE RANGE *** £325,000 - £350,000 ***"
"A mid-terraced 2 bedroom period house located on the outskirts of the City of Canterbury, but within easy access of main supermarkets, restaurants, shops and the latest Riverside development which includes a new Curzon cinema and restaurants. Now requiring some updating. NO CHAIN. • Unl..."
**WATCH OUR NARRATED VIDEO TOUR** Kent Estate Agencies are proud to offer this beautifully presented executive two bedroom first floor flat to the market in Canterbury. The property has been owned from new by the current owners and has been maintained to a high standard offering you the oppo...
"Guide Price £325,000 - £350,000 Mann Estate Agents are delighted to welcome this three double-bedroom townhouse situated over three floors. On the ground floor there is a large lounge and separate dining room both with a superb feature fireplace. The galley-style kitc..."
"A handsome three bedroom Grade II listed Georgian terrace house, offered to the market with no onward chain and located in a quiet residential street in St Dunstans within walking distance of the city centre and Canterbury West railway station. The property is currently let as an HMO to thre (cont.)"
"** PRICE RANGE £325,000 - £350,000 **** NO ONWARD CHAIN **Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom semi detached bungalow with no onward chain, positioned at the top of a quiet road in Canterbury."
"Mann Estate Agents are delighted to welcome this fantastic three-bedroom semi-detached family home with plenty of potential for a growing family or to downsize to. Situated in a sought-after cul-de-sac location this home boasts a generous driveway, plenty of on-street parking, a garage and a Sout..."
"**NO CHAIN** GENEROUS GARDEN ** THREE BEDROOMS ** UPSTAIRS BATHROOM ** DOWNSTAIRS WC ** Good size three bedroom semi detached house in Devon Road. This property would make a fantastic family home. The accommodation comprises of; entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, ..."
Fantastic 2 bedroom apartment with views to the Cathedral and Marlow theatre.
"A great opportunity to purchase a project that needs to be finished. When finished the property will offer a two apartments, a one bed and a two bed in a convenient location on the edge of Canterbury. The property is set over four floors, boasts a rear garden and easy acces to Canterbury City."
"KEY WORKER? YOU COULD SAVE UP TO £15,500! An attractive first floor home with garage below, The Stevenson provides flexible space for modern living. The spacious open-plan lounge has a dining area while the kitchen has room for a breakfast table. As well as a good-sized main bedroom, there is als..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £314,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £475,000"
"This very well presented TWO BEDROOM mews style property is offered to the market with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The home is ideally situated for local shopping and leisure facilities as well Canterbury West train station. The property enjoys open plan living, two double bedrooms and allocated parking."
"IDEAL FUTURE FAMILY HOME or INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY offered to the market WITH TENANTS IN SITU. A very spacious and well presented FIVE BEDROOM, END OF TERRACE BUNGALOW located in an IDEAL POSITION close to both Kent and Christchurch Universities. Offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN!"
"*** PRICE RANGE £300,000 - £325,000 ***Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this three bedroom end of terrace Victorian home in Martyrs Field, Canterbury.A popular residential area with attractive period buildings just a short walk to the city centre with the wealth of amenities, pubs eateries a..."
"Bairstow Eves are delighted to bring to the open market a deceptively spacious three double bedroom family home that has been recently modernised and must be viewed to appreciate the accommodation on offer. Upon entry, the bright and airy hallway leads through to a considerably large ..."
Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this lovely retirement apartment located next to the Kent Cricket Ground in this popular south Canterbury location.
"*** End of Chain ***Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this two bedroom split level apartment in New Dover Road, Canterbury.The entrance to the accommodation is via a communal lobby."
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this four bedroom home in South Street, Canterbury.Situated off of Sturry Road close to local shops and amenities plus just a short distance to the city centre this surprisingly spacious family home is being offered end of chain.The accommodation in brief con..."
"Chain Free! Located in Canterbury's one of the most sought after locations. Just a stone's throw away from the lively city centre. For those wanting to put their own stamp on a new home, look no further as this is the perfect property, bursting with character and with bright and spacious accommod..."
"*** Price Range £300,000 - £325,0000 ***** POTENTIAL TO EXTEND SUBJECT TO PLANNING PERMISSION - GREAT SIZED GARDEN **Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this lovely two bedroom end of terrace home with high ceilings and exposed beams throughout, the property is full of character."
"Mann Estate Agents are delighted to bring to market this wonderful retirement apartment located next to the Kent Cricket Ground. Immaculately-presented throughout, this beautiful home needs to be viewed to appreciate the apartment and its sought-after location. This first-floor apartm..."
Unique opportunity to own a fantastic size maisonette with an enclosed garden on popular new development. With allocated parking & nearby city amenities. Call today to view the show home.
Two bedroom mid terrace house in popular South Canterbury with no forward chain!
STUNNING 2 BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOME LOCATED IN THE POPULAR AREA OF WINCHEAP!
Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the market this beautifully presented two bedroom semi-detached bungalow on Sturry Road.
"Guide Price £300,000 - £325,000. 3 bedroom semi-detached chalet bungalow on a quiet residential area. Sold with tenants in situ until July 2023. Generous living/dining room & additional reception room. Garden, garage & driveway."
"**SHORT WALK TO CITY CENTRE**Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this large two bedroom apartment situated within the city walls and just a short two minute walk, to the main high street."
"Your Move are proud to offer this semi detached home, offered as an investment opportunity. Let through Your Move, Canterbury, the home is let for £1300pcm. This great buy offers a terrific space for tenants to enjoy and offers a location that will work for many. Call Your Move today! Counc..."
"Situated in an area now undergoing significant regeneration, this spacious end of terrace property was previously let to students but would now make an excellent home or perhaps continue as a functioning buy to let. No onward chain complications."
"No Chain, Close To Centre, Courtyard Garden"
"FABULOUS TWO BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE WITH ALLOCATED PARKING SPACE, LOVELY GARDEN AND AN ADDITIONAL GARDEN THAT COULD BE PERFECT FOR A SIDE EXTENSION (subject to any required consents)
"
"A quirky two-bedroomed Grade II listed building, a stone's throw from the City Centre, Kent & Canterbury Hospital and excellent transport links for commuters and travellers, comes to market with a Guide Price of £290,000. This 3-storey living property has huge potential for a first-time buy..."
Four bedroom terraced house with no forward chain within walking distance of Canterbury City Centre!
This superb purpose built first floor flat is located just yards away from the St Lawrence Cricket Ground ***Share of Freehold***
"Guide Price £290,000 - £310,000. Ideally located for city centre & nearby commuter links. Neutrally decorated throughout & ready for its next owner to move into"
"Connells are pleased to welcome to the market this chain free, five bedroom terraced home which is located within close proximity to the city centre and Canterbury east train station. This home boats versatile accommodation throughout and would therefore make an ideal family home or BTL investment!"
"***Ideal First Time Buyer or Investment Opportunity**** This beautiful two double bedroom property is conveniently located inside of the City Walls and benefits from allocated parking, Double aspect Lounge/Diner, Fitted Kitchen and bathroom! The apartment has tenants in situ until July 2023, is ..."
Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this superb three bedroom family home located in North Canterbury within walking distance of the city centre and Canterbury West railway station.
"Abode Sales & Lettings are delighted to present this immaculate two double bedroom townhouse in the popular Bingley Court Development, which would make an ideal City Centre home or investment property. The accommodation comprises of it's own entrance, leading to a spacious internal ha (cont.)"
"A charming grade two listed home in a prime Canterbury location, close to the West Station. The property is a stone`s throw from the bustling high street and stunning Westgate Gardens. Currently undergoing refurbishment and sold with no forward chain."
A very attractive two bedroom house forming part of the conversion of an Edwardian warehouse and located in a central location within walking distance of the city centre and both Canterbury East and West stations. The property is offered to the market with no onward chain and has some lovely (cont.)
"A fantastically sized chain free, end of terrace property, located a short walk to the city centre. The property is a great first time buyer purchase to put their own stamp on! Boasting plenty of storage, a downstairs cloakroom and a garage!"
"Your Move are delighted to offer this terraced home offered with no forward chain. Currently let, this great buy will work for first time buyers, investors or anyone looking for an affordable home in the Canterbury market. EPC Grade C."
"This ground floor contemporary apartment offers ample living space with a large double fronted lounge, spacious hallway and double bedrooms. The stylish interior compliments the attractive building which was once one of Canterbury's famous River Stour mills."
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this grade II listed home in Ivy Lane, Canterbury.This quaint cottage is set down a quiet lane just a few minutes walk from the city centre with its wealth of amenities and train station with high speed links back to London.The accommodation in ..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £281,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £425,000"
"This charming and attractive semi-detached property is located in a popular central location, a stones throw away from Canterbury city centre. A good size rear garden offers ample private outside space with views onto the alluring Westgate Gardens which sit behind."
"Close to Town, No Chain, Off Road Parking!"
"Offered to market chain free and vacant this period terraced house is in a prime location and with some moderate TLC could easily be updated. Benefitting from being positioned on the quiet St Peters Grove with a secluded and private garden to the rear, this property has lots to offer."
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom split level apartment, with two bathrooms and a homely feel."
"* Guide Price £280,000 - £300,000* Mann Countrywide are excited to offer this stunning and immaculately-presented two double bedroom flat located in the heart of the historic Cathedral City of Canterbury with off road parking. This apartment has been decorated to a meticulou..."
"This characterful semi detached house has been vastly improved by the current owner creating a warm and welcoming home ready to move straight into. With polished timber floorboards, exposed brick work and sumptuous carpet upstairs, this inviting property will be popular."
*** NO CHAIN ***Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom end of terraced property.
"Your Move are delighted to offer this end of terrace home offered with no forward chain. Currently let, this great buy will work for first time buyers, investors or anyone looking for an affordable home in the Canterbury market. EPC Grade D."
"GUIDE PRICE £280,000 to £290,000 VERY STYLISH second floor apartment with ALLOCATED UNDERCOVER PARKING, located by the River Stour within the exclusive development of Kingsbrook Park. The property offers good space with TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS & an open plan lounge/diner/kitchen area with balcony."
"Your Move is proud to offer this semi detached home currently let by the current owner. Available to landlords and buyers looking for a family home, call Your Move in Canterbury to book your viewing today. EPC Grade D. "
"*CHARMING COTTAGE IN CENTRAL CANTERBURY IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS* Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this fully refurbished two bedroom cottage situated in a sought after central Canterbury location, just a short walk to cafes, restaurants and retail therapy!!"
This two bedroom terraced house enjoys a lovely setting in a quiet side road off Westgate Court Avenue looking out onto a leafy green. 25 Runcie Place comprises of a separate entrance hall leading into an open plan lounge/diner and kitchen area. French doors from the living room overloo (cont.)
"Guide Price £280,000. A 5 bedroom terraced house on the popular London Road development with easy access to the city centre. Currently let as a HMO with a possible rental income of £1820 PCM. No onward chain."
**NO CHAIN ** THREE BEDROOM ** CUL DE SAC LOCATION ** Bairstow Eves are delighted to offer this spacious three bedroom home in Cambridge Way. This spacious home offers comfortable accommodation in a quiet cul-de-sac setting on the edge of Canterbury. We highly r...
"Your Move in Canterbury would like to introduce you to this character, end of terraced home located in the heart of Canterbury. Currently let, this terrific home offers so many options to a buyer whether you are looking for a home or an investment. Call Your Move today for more information on thi..."
"Three Bedrooms, Two reception Rooms, Close To City Centre"
TWO BEDROOM mid terrace home is sold with a TENANT IN SITU making it an ideal investment opportunity. The property is ideally situated providing easy access to Canterbury City Centre and train stations and also benefits from a decent rear garden and off road parking to the rear.
A delightful two bedroom semi-detached bungalow with a wonderful garden backing on to the river Stour situated just a 10 minute walk from the City centre and Canterbury west railway station and is offered for sale with no forward chain. The front door opens to the entrance hall with do...
"Guide Price £275,000 to £325,000 For sale by public auctionunconditional online auction.
. Town & Country Property Auctions are delighted to offer for sale by public auction this Beautiful Town House in Love Lane, Canterbury, Kent, CT1 1TZ. The property has been well maintaine..."
A Grade II listed spacious apartment with comprehensive and versatile accommodation arranged over two floors set close to the city centre. The property is well presented throughout with atmospheric period features. The property has a private front door leading up stairs to a part galleried dining...
"Coming to the market chain free, this three bedroom semi detached home provides generous living space within the open plan lounge dining room and conservatory. There is a driveway with space for at least two vehicles and a good size rear garden with brick storage. Sold with no chain!"
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £274,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £415,000"
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £271,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £410,000"
"** OPEN HOUSE SATURDAY 1ST APRIL** by appointment A superb semi detached house, with an abundance of parking and a garage. Located in Broad oak this is one not to be missed! Call us today to arrange a viewing"
"*** END OF CHAIN ***Miles and Barr are delighted to be offering to the market this large two bedroom first floor flat in George Roche Road, Canterbury."
Fantastic location just off the city centre and great access to both Canterbury East and West Stations.
"GUIDE PRICE £270,000 - £280,000 Well presented three/four bedroom property within the city walls. The accommodation comprises of entrance hall, living room/bedroom four, dining room open plan to the kitchen, downstairs bathroom, upstairs there are three separate ..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £270,000 - £290,000** Bairstow Eves are pleased to bring to the market this semi-detached bungalow with off road parking, good sized enclosed garden and huge amount of potential. On entrance through the front door, you are met by a welcoming entranc..."
"A charming three bedroom end-of-terrace Edwardian cottage located within a few minutes' walk of Canterbury West railway station, St Dunstans and the city centre. The property offers beautiful views over the River Stour and towards the Cathedral and would make an excellent first-time purchase (cont.)"
"** NO CHAIN ** TWO RECEPTION ROOMS ** THREE BEDROOMS ** NICE SIZE GARDEN ** OPPORTUNITY TO PUT YOUR OWN STAMP ON THE PROPERTY ** Bairstow Eves are pleased to bring to the open market a three bedroom semi detached home in the desirable location of Heaton Road, Canterbury. **..."
"Guide Price £260,000 - £270,000. A spacious 3 bedroom end of terrace family home within close proximity of Canterbury West train station, the city centre & the university of Kent. Fantastic investment opportunity. No onward chain."
"Amazing Investment Opportunity - Three Double Bedroom City Centre Apartment Offering an impressive yield of 6.46% and tenanted until the end of August 2023, this ground floor apartment benefits from a modern fitted kitchen, brand new bathroom and open plan living. There are three dou (cont.)"
"The house sits on a large corner plot and has been renovated to a high standard with fresh neutral décor and newly laid carpet or wood effect flooring throughout. The property is tucked away at the end of a row of terraces, hidden by tall fences and shrubbery and is not overlooked. "
"***Fantastic Investment Opportunity*** Three Double Bedrooms Apartment which benefits from a modern fitted kitchen, open plan living accommodation, En suite to the master bedroom, large balcony and allocated parking. It is being sold with tenants in situ until July 2023. A fantastic investment ..."
"Connells of Canterbury offer this FOUR BEDROOM mid terrace house. It is an ideal investment for student accommodation in a popular residential location. Close to the Universities in Canterbury and local amenities, the property also consists of a lounge, modern kitchen and family bathroom. NO CHAIN."
"Your Move are delighted to offer this great family home offered via Auction. Requiring modernisation throughout, this great opportunity will attract a lot of attention so do not miss your chance to view. An open day is coming soon..... EPC Grade F. Council tax band C."
"Your Move are delighted to offer this terraced house currently let and arranged as four bedrooms. Please note the seller is placing this and number 14 (located next door) onto the market. If you an investor, a first time buyer or anyone looking for an affordable home, call to arrange your viewing..."
"Your Move are delighted to offer this terraced house currently let and arranged as four bedrooms. Please note the seller is placing this and number 13 (located next door) onto the market. If you an investor, a first time buyer or anyone looking for an affordable home, call to arrange your viewing..."
INVESTMENT BUYERS ONLY. Currently tenanted until 27/7/2024.
"Churchill Sales & Lettings are delighted to be marketing this two double bedroom apartment which is situated on the first floor of this much sought after development, Abbots Lodge. The apartment offers deceptively spacious accommodation and is located in a convenient position, a short distance fr..."
"SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM APARTMENT WITH PARKING Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom split level apartment, situated in desirable south Canterbury and within a short walking distance of Canterbury city centre."
"Four bedroom bungalow, good size rear garden, no forward chain!"
"Abode Sales & Lettings are delighted to present this City Centre prime location 3 bed terraced townhouse full of potential, with no forward chain. This would be well suited to a family or as an investment and has previously been successfully let for £1200pcm and is currently tenanted (cont.)"
"Mann Estate Agents are delighted to bring this chain-free, well-presented, first-floor retirement flat, a stone's throw from Canterbury West Rail Station and walking distance from Canterbury City Centre. On entry, the hallway leads through to a spacious open plan lounge/dining room. There is..."
"This top floor apartment is located in the popular Bellflower Mews development, just off the New Dover Road and within half a mile of Canterbury city centre."
A fantastic two bedroom apartment within an exclusive purpose built complex.
** No Onward Chain ** Grade II Listed Building **Miles and Barr are delighted to bring to the market this two bedroom first floor apartment on Marlowe Avenue situated in the busy city of Canterbury.
Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this mid terrace bungalow in Hales Place.
Miles and Barr are delighted to be offering to the market this large three bedroom second floor apartment in the popular Bingley Court development.
"PUBLIC NOTICE – 184 PINE TREE AVENUE, CANTERBURY, CT2 7SZ - WE HAVE RECEIVED AN OFFER OF £250,000. ANY INTERESTED PARTIES MUST SUBMIT ANY HIGHER OFFERS IN WRITING TO THE SELLING AGENT BEFORE EXCHANGE OF CONTRACTS TAKE PLACE. - EPC RATING E ** CASH BUYERS ONLY ** CORNER PLO..."
"Chain Free! This unique first floor apartment offers versatile accommodation for individuals or a family. The current owner has installed an additional shower room, and small kitchenette area in the large reception room. A real money earner if rented or space for all the family."
"Close to University, Three Bedrooms, No Chain!"
"Miles & Barr are delighted to be offering this well presented, modern, two bedroom apartment located within desirable South Canterbury and just a 10 minute walk from the city centre."
"Buyers Fees apply - see brochure for details. A blank canvass ready to put your own mark on, this end of terrace property could make an ideal investment purchase or become a lovely family home with some TLC! Offered chain free, with gardens to the front and rear, plus an integral garage with driv..."
"* Guide Price £240,000 - £260,000 * Mann Countrywide are excited to offer this stunning two double bedroom flat found in this historic building located in the heart of Canterbury City High Street. Decorated to a meticulous standard there are numerous benefits that will..."
"* Guide Price £240,000 - £260,000 * Mann Estate Agents are delighted to bring to market a modern two bedroom, first-floor apartment for sale on the sought-after Stonebridge Road in Canterbury. The apartment benefits from a light and airy open-plan living area, which fe..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £238,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £360,000"
*** TENANT IN SITU UNTIL AUGUST 2023 ***MODERN POPULAR DEVELOPMENT* Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this well presented two double bedroom second floor apartment.
"A superb two bedroom ground floor apartment situated in an exclusive river-side development within walking distance of the city centre and local shops and amenities. The property is offered to the market with no onward chain and the accommodation is well presented, light and spacious through (cont.)"
**A RARE OPPUTUNITY TO PURCHASE A CHAIN FREE LARGE LUXURY GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT WITH ITS OWN GARAGE SPACE** This superb apartment is on the edge of a modern waterside development and is located in the grounds of a converted mill. This is enviably one of the most spacious flats on the block and...
"GUIDE PRICE £235,000 - £255,000 ***TWO BEDROOMS, TWO BATHROOMS ***ALLOCATED PARKING AND GARAGE***GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT***READY TO MOVE INTO WITH NO CHAIN***IDEAL INVESTMENT OR HOME*** Bairstow Eves are privileged to bring to the open market a superb two double b..."
"This two bedroom first floor apartment is very well presented throughout including modern kitchen, bathroom and en suite to main bedroom. The property enjoys unallocated parking spaces and is sold with no onward chain."
"A 2 bedroom leasehold first floor apartment with an allocated parking space, ideal for first time buyers."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £231,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £350,000"
"Mann Countrywide are delighted to welcome this two double bedroom terraced home to the market. Situated in a South-Canterbury fantastic city centre location, this home would make an excellent first-time purchase or investment venture. The downstairs accommodation currently comprises of a living r..."
"Sold with no onward chain and with a tenant in situ, this well presented, two bedroom apartment makes an ideal investment. Set in Canterbury's City Walls, the property provides easy access to Canterbury City Centre and train station. Open plan living accommodation, two bathrooms & parking available."
Spacious Ground Floor Two Bedroom Apartment in Exclusive Gated Development with Allocated Parking and No Forward Chain!
"No Forward Chain, two bedroom split level apartment with allocated parking within the city walls!"
"This spacious recently renovated two bedroom first floor apartment would be an ideal first time buy or investment. The property boasts two bathrooms, parking, lift access and is a short walk to the town centre and Canterbury East station."
"Offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED, TWO BEDROOM, SECOND FLOOR apartment with ALLOCATED PARKING set within Canterbury City walls and within a short walk of shopping amenities and Canterbury East train station."
Abode Sales & Lettings are delighted to present this stylish three double bedroom apartment in the popular St Andrews Close Development. Fantastic Investment Property - Three Double Bedroom City Centre Apartment Offering an impressive yield of over 7% and tenanted until the end (cont.)
"Charming, two bedroom apartment located in South Canterbury with allocated parking!"
"This spacious self contained, two bedroom first floor apartment is an ideal investment opportunity sold with long term tenant in situ. The property comprises a lounge dining room, kitchen and bathroom. The property also enjoys a rear garden area and is set in a convenient location."
Ideal Investment | Tenants in Situ | Underground Parking | Fully Refurbished Throughout | Five Min Walk to City Centre | Double Bedrooms |Miles and Barr are delighted to be offering to the market this trendy large two bedroom apartment situated in the Old Tannery development.
"Fantastic Investment Property - Three Double Bedroom City Centre Apartment Offering an impressive yield of over 7% and tenanted until the end of July 2023, this ground floor apartment currently achieves £1400 rental and benefits from a modern fitted kitchen, contemporary bathroom and (cont.)"
This 2 bedroom ground floor apartment with an allocated parking space is ideal for first-time buyers and downsizers alike.
Mulberry Court is a very popular and attractive development of retirement apartments located in a particularly convenient ‘tucked away’ position in Stour Street. This beautifully presented ground floor apartment looks over the river Stour and is within a couple of minutes walk of the High Street...
"If you are looking for a slick modern city centre apartment a stones throw away from canterbury West train station with secure underground parking, then look no further. Ideal as a first time buy or as an investment opportunity."
"A lovely two bedroom first floor apartment with a garage and residents` parking. Share of freehold with 993 year lease. Located in Canterbury`s desirable south side, the property is a short walk from Kent & Canterbury hospital and City Centre"
"This inviting modern 2 bedroom apartment is really spacious and takes in lots of light due to it's dual aspect. You can enjoy beautiful views from your Juliet balcony down onto the picturesque gardens, and stroll along the river into the historic City centre of Canterbury, beautifully presented t..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £224,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £340,000"
"This stunning first floor apartment is ready to move straight into or let out, within close proximity to the city centre and riverside walks, in an area undergoing significant regeneration. The modern open plan living space is extremely sociable and good for entertaining, and there is an allocate..."
"**IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR INVESTMENT**Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this stunning two double bedroom top floor apartment, overlooking woodland, located within walking distance of Canterbury City Centre, in the popular Homersham development."
"Your Move are proud to offer this great buy located within Flagstaff Court. Currently let through Your Move, the seller is offering the property with a tenant in situ - the apartment currently lets for £1200 pcm including water bills. For more information please contact Your Move in Canterb..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £218,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £330,000"
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £215,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £325,000"
*SPACIOUS TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT WITH TENANTS IN SITU!*NO ONWARD CHAIN!
"This spacious first floor coach house style apartment is located in the prestigious Kingsbrook Park development within walking distance of Canterbury West Train Station and only a short walk from the city centre! Self contained and very well presented throughout, benefits own allocated parking space"
"Offers over £210,000 Bairstow Eves are delighted to offer this impressive period first floor flat with access from the ground floor to delightful communal gardens that are wall enclosed with an abundance of established shrubs and plants. There is an oak sweeping staircase leading..."
"An exciting new development of high quality one and two bedroom apartments in the heart of Canterbury! Prices Start from £210,000....."
"Just on market , very nice , spacious and modern (approx ) 29 year old 2 bedroom static home backing onto woodland , available for a quick sale if required .Located midway between Canterbury and Herne Bay .Mains gas central heating , double glazing . Age limit minimum 55 years. Service charge ..."
"**Guide Price £200,000 - £220,000** ** TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS ** EN-SUITE TO MASTER BEDOOM ** SEPARATE BATHROOM ** OFF ROAD PARKING ** PRIVATE GARDEN ** Bairstow Eves are privileged to bring to the open market a deceptively spacious two double bedroom, two bathroom baseme..."
Currently Let until June 2023. A fantastic bright and Airy first floor flat located close to Canterbury's City Centre.
"*Offers in excess of £200,000* A beautiful two bedroom flat situated in a character building along the Old Dover Road. Mann Countrywide are delighted to bring to the market this two bedroom, first floor flat situated in the Grade II listed building, The Hoystings along the Old Do..."
"Located on the edge of a very small development, sits this modern one bedroom ground floor apartment built approximately 10 years ago. Talk about a prime location, Sainsbury's local is seconds awa..."
"Miles & Barr are delighted to be offering this lovely two bedroom apartment located in the desirable Barton Mill Road development, just over half a mile from Canterbury city centre."
"**GUIDE PRICE £220,000 - £240,000** Two bedroom, first floor apartment, close to Canterbury city centre. Entrance to hall, storage cupboard, two double bedrooms, the master bedroom benefits from a fitted wardrobe and ensuite. Spacious living room which can easily fit in ..."
"Pure Investor brings to the market this 2-bed 4th floor (top floor) apartment in Flagstaff Court, Canterbury CT1 3HA. The property is being sold with tenant in situ!"
Freehold House Vacant Possession
Churchill Sales & Lettings are delighted to be marketing this lovely one bedroom first floor apartment. The property offers deceptively spacious accommodation throughout and is presented in good order. The Lounge offers ample space for living and dining room furniture with a door leadin...
IN THE HEART OF THE CITY. Miles and Barr are delighted to present this modern purpose built first floor flat. Situated in a historical part of Canterb...
Churchill Sales & Lettings are delighted to be marketing this lovely one bedroom first floor apartment overlooking the communal garden. The property offers deceptively spacious accommodation throughout and is presented in good order. The Lounge offers ample space for living and dining r...
"**NO CHAIN** TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT ** Guide Price £200,000- £220,000 A beautiful two bedroom flat situated in a character building along the Old Dover Road. Bairstow Eves are delighted to bring to the market this two bedroom, first floor flat situated ..."
"NO ONWARD CHAINMiles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this wonderful two bedroom ground floor apartment forming part of Peri Court, a small development of flats within a quiet cul-de-sac location."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £198,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £300,000"
"A superb apartment enjoying far reaching views of the City and Cathedral. Spacious, bright accommodation featuring two double bedrooms. Garage. In need of cosmetic updating throughout. * Awaiting EPC*"
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £194,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £295,000"
A Stunning Loft Style Apartment Close to the city centre.
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £188,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £285,000"
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £188,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £285,000"
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £185,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £280,000"
"A superb apartment located in the popular Old Tannery Development within the city walls of Canterbury. Located on the first floor set a little way away from the other flats, this apartment offers a pleasant outlook onto the peaceful, pedestrianised square below."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £185,000 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £280,000"
Miles & Barr are delighted to be offering this lovely one bedroom apartment located in the popular Ripple Court development.
Whether you are looking to put those exciting first steps on the property ladder or are searching for a solid long term investment this spacious one bedroom apartment in one of Canterbury's most desirable locations is a must see. Stepping inside the space on offer here is what stands it apart f...
"Your Move are proud to offer this attractive apartment offered with no forward chain. In need of modernisation, the home offers walking distance to the High Street and Kent & Canterbury Hospital. Lease length 999 years. Maintenance is variable shared between the three apartments to the proper..."
"Superb first and second floor flat for the over 60s, available in the ever-popular Chantry Court Retirement Development situated within the City Centre. 18 Chantry Court is a well presented first and second floor maisonette, which is for the over 60s able to live independently. There ar..."
"** NO CHAIN ** One bedroom mews style house in a convenient location. On the ground floor you will find a cloakroom, the open plan lounge/dining area and a newly fitted kitchen. To the first floor you will find the bedroom with en-suite shower room. There is a co..."
*MODERN ONE BEDROOM APARTMENT IN CENTRAL CANTERBURY!*NO ONWARD CHAIN!
"A recently refurbished one bedroom, ground floor retirement apartment for the over 60’s situated just a 2 minute walk from the High Street and backing on to the River Stour. Mulberry Court is a very popular and attractive development of retirement apartments located in a particularly c..."
"Luxurious apartment with balcony over the River Stour, close to West Station."
Page & Co are offering this superb apartment for sale in Canterbury.
"Guide Price £170,000 - £190,000 Juliet Balconies | City Centre Location | Chain-Free | Desirable Location | Communal Gardens Mann Countrywide are delighted to offer to the market this well-presented chain-free, spacious one-bedroom second-floor apartment situated..."
"Starting Bid £170,000 plus reservation fee. Modern 2 bed 2nd floor apartment close to the city centre. Open plan living room/kitchen with balcony. 2 double bedrooms with en-suite shower room & fitted wardrobes to main bedroom. Allocated parking for 1 car & no onward chain."
"Exceptional and spacious two bedroom, second floor apartment within a sought after retirement community in a central location within walking distance of the Cathedral City of Canterbury centre and Canterbury West Train Station. Please Quote JV0094
"
"A well-located, purpose-built ground floor flat offering comfortable accommodation in a convenient setting. The propertyincludes a large sitting/dining room, a double bedroom, a well-equipped bathroom with electric shower over the bath anda comprehensively fitted kitchen incorporating a range of ..."
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £165,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £250,000"
"Offered with no forward chain, this great apartment is located in walking distance to transport and the city centre. Do not miss your chance to view - call us today! EPC Grade D. Service charge £250.00 per qtr approx. Lease Date : 28 September 2006 Term : 150 years from 29 September 19..."
"Buyers Fees apply - see brochure for details. OPEN HOUSE THIS SATURDAY (1ST APRIL) - by appointment only. Chain Free! End of terraced house in need of full refurbishment, located in an excellent position close to Canterbury City Centre, just off of the Old Dover Road, cash buyers only due to the ..."
NO ONWARD CHAIN!Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom ground floor maisonette with driveway parking and a private garden to the rear.
** SHARE OF FREEHOLD**Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom maisonette with a private garden and driveway parking to the front.
A two bedroom purpose built first floor retirement close to the centre of Canterbury City centre offered for sale with no forward chain.
"PRICED TO SELL - Calling all Flat Hunters! St Andrews Close offers a short walk to Canterbury High Street & more with this apartment block popular with first time buyers to investors. Offered with no forward chain, do not miss your chance to view! EPC Grade C. Council tax band B. Lease term -..."
This spacious one bedroom is set in the City location of Rhodaus Close and is a perfect opportunity to purchase a spacious one bedroom flat close to Canterbury City and local rail stations. Leading through the entrance hallway you have a large bedroom to your right and to your left is ...
CALLING ALL INVESTORS looking to make an instant return with TENANTS IN SITU! First floor apartment within walking distance to Canterbury city centre. This comes with the right to use a parking space although this is not included within the title deeds of the property.
"PERFECT FIRST TIME BUY OR INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. This first floor flat is conveniently located for Canterbury City Centre & local amenities. Comprising lounge, fitted kitchen, double bedroom, bathroom and off street parking, View now to avoid disappointment!"
"Brand new home on popular new development just over 1 mile from nearby city centre with excellent amenities. Contemporary kitchens, allocated parking & shares available from 40% on the Governments Help to Buy, Shared Ownership Scheme"
Page and Co are pleased to present to the market this ground floor apartment in Rhodaus Close which is being sold with no onward chain.
A TWO BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT LOCATED ON THE FIRST FLOOR WITH RIVER VIEWS Deans Mill Court is flanked on three sides by the River Stour and was constructed to resemble the water mill that previously occupied the site. The development was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) ...
"A fantastic two bedroom first floor retirement apartment located in a prestigious river-side complex in central Canterbury within easy reach of local shops, the Marlowe Theatre and Canterbury West railway station. The property is offered to the market with no onward chain and is well present (cont.)"
Miles & Barr are delighted to offer to the market this light and airy first floor retirement apartment.
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £148,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £225,000"
"Lifetime Lease price for Over 60s: You can benefit from saving up to 59% from the market value with a one-off payment to become the Lifetime Lease owner of this property. The guide price of £145,500 is reflective of an average 33.3% saving as an example. Market Value Price: £220,000"
"VACANT, 2 BEDROOM STATIC HOME LOCATED ON A POPULAR RESIDENTIAL PARK APPROX. 4 MILES FROM THE CITY OF CANTERBURY . THE VILLAGE SHOP AND A PUBLIC HOUSE WITH RESTAURANT ARE CLOSE BY . BUS ROUTE TO CANTERBURY AND HERNE BAY AT HAND ,.MAINS GAS CENTRAL HEATING. DOUBLE GLAZING , MIN .AGE RESTRICTI..."
"Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this one bedroom retirement apartment situated in the sought-after Barton Mill Court development close to St Dunstans, Sainsburys, Canterbury West station and a short walk to the city centre."
"Just available , chain free , approx 17year old Omar Sherrington style 2 bedroom 32ft X 20 ft static home , located on one of the most popular static home sites in the area midway between Canterbury and Herne bay . All electric heating with radiators , double glazing ,off road parking , fitt..."
"Warren Lodge is a small development of retirement properties (minimum age 55) situated on the outskirts of Canterbury. It has a communal residents' lounge, a lift to all floors, communal gardens and an on-site manager. The apartment itself is on the first floor and is spacious, light and ver (cont.)"
A comfortable purpose-built retirement apartment on the ground floor of an impressive complex by McCarthy & Stone close to Canterbury City Centre and Canterbury West railway station. The property occupies a corner setting within the building which gives the main sitting/dining room a lovely dual ...
"Nicely appointed 2 bedroom Park Home for the over 55 s . Approx 25 years old , located on the ever popular BLUEBELL WOODS residential site between Herne Bay and Canterbury . Parking for this property is just a few yards away in the main car park costing £6.87 pcm. . Features electric wall moun..."
A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE FIRST FLOOR Barton Mill Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 53 properties arranged over 3 floors each served by lift. The Development Manager can be contacted from various points within each property in...
A VERY WELL PRESENTED ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE FIRST FLOOR WHICH HAS BEEN COMPLETELY RENOVATED Barton Mill Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 53 properties arranged over 3 floors each served by lift. The Development Manager can...
A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE GROUND FLOOR WITH PATIO DOOR Barton Mill Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 53 properties arranged over 3 floors each served by lift. The Development Manager can be contacted from various points within...
Miles and Barr are delighted to offer this two bedroom ground floor apartment in Warren Lodge.Benefitting from direct access onto the communal gardens from the lounge patio doors this over 55s retirement home is part of a development constructed by Pelham Homes consisting of twenty five two bedro...
Great first time buy or investment opportunity boasting city centre living.
"Mann Estate Agents are delighted to welcome this one bedroom, first floor retirement apartment in the desirable location of South Canterbury. There is superb living accommodation with warden assistance on site. There are wonderful well-established communal gardens and a real sense of a comm..."
A SECOND FLOOR ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT Homespire House was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 54 properties arranged over 3 floors each served by lift. The Development Manager can be contacted from various points within each property in the case of an...
A fantastic opportunity to move into this lovely first floor apartment in this desirable independent retirement building which has been newly decorated and new fitted carpets throughout. 
"Exclusively for the over 50's on the Dengrove Park Home site, located in the sought after village of Broad Oak. This one bed park home is ideally situated with access to local amenities and is on main transport routes into coastal Herne Bay and The Cathedral City of Canterbury. With mains gas fi..."
A ONE BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT Homespire House was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 54 properties arranged over 3 floors each served by lift. The Development Manager can be contacted from various points within each property in the case of an em...
"*INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - TENANTS IN SITU PAYING £800 PCM* A SECOND FLOOR ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT Bairstow Eves are pleased to offer for sale this fantastically located one bedroom retirement apartment on the second floor. The apartment is located in Knotts Lane, j..."
"OVER 60's ONLY ... Your Move are proud to offer this ground floor apartment located within the heart of Canterbury. With the city on your doorstep, do not miss the opportunity to view this great buy!! EPC Grade C Council Tax band B. Lease 99yrs from Sept 1984. GR £500 approx. per annu..."
*OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE 40% THROUGH THE SHARED OWNERSHIP SCHEME* This spacious first floor coach house style apartment is located in the prestigious Kingsbrook Park development within walking distance of Canterbury West Train Station and only a short walk from the city centre!
"Guide Price £80,000 Mann Countrywide are delighted to welcome this studio apartment. The property is located on the ground floor and accomodation comprises: entrance hallway, bathroom, living/bedroom area leading round to the kitchen. Externally, there are communal gardens. "
A GROUND FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT BENEFITTING FROM A LEASE EXTENSION Homespire House was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 54 properties arranged over 3 floors each served by lift. The Development Manager can be contacted from various points within each pr...
"Offered to the market is this one bedroom, ground floor retirement apartment offering independant living and 24 hour care line, situated within the city walls. The property enjoys gated parking area and communal rooms including lounge and laundry. The property is sold with no onward chain."
"Chain Free! For those seeking a blend of independence and security, this top floor flat would make an excellent retirement option being on the doorstep of Canterbury and all it amenities."
"Bairstow Eves are pleased to offer for sale a well presented one bedroom park home within a secluded garden backing onto woodland. This is a fine example of a one bedroom park home. On entry, the hallway leads through to a double bedroom with views overlooking the garden. There is a recently..."
Miles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this one bedroom ground floor retirement flat.
"Set in an extremely convenient position on the outskirts of the City of Canterbury being 3/4 mile from the City centre with its shopping facilities, Cathedral, bus routes and Canterbury East railway station. The Canterbury West railway station with its links to London and St Dunstan’s Street are ..."
"READYMADE INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. One bedroom STUDENT SUITE currently let out, open plan to its own lounge/kitchen area. Located within the student village of Parham Rd, this suite has a secure card entry system & includes a SHOWER ROOM with access to a communal social living area. NO ONWARD CHAIN!"
"*ATTENTION INVESTORS* A STUDENT SUITE with its own open plan bedroom, lounge & kitchen area. Located within the Canterbury student village of Parham Road, this suite has a secure card entry system & includes a SHOWER ROOM with access to a communal social living area & laundry room. NO ONWARD CHAIN!"
"Set in the heart of Canterbury is this one bedroom, first floor, retirement apartment for people aged 55 or over. The property is in need of updating and includes a lounge, double bedroom, kitchen and bathroom. There is a communal lounge, laundry room and gardens. Sold with no chain."
"**GUIDE PRICE £60,000 - £70,000** Bairstow Eves are pleased to offer for sale this fantastically located one bedroom retirement apartment on the second floor. The apartment is located in Knotts Lane, just a stones throw from Canterbury High Street and array of convenience s..."
"*Currently Let* One Bedroom STUDENT POD, with the potential to achieve a 6.5% YIELD, located within the student village of Parham Road. This pod has secure card access & includes a SHOWER ROOM with access to a communal kitchen and social living area. NO ONWARD CHAIN."
"***Guide Price: £58,000 - £62,000*** Mann Countrywide are delighted to welcome this one bedroom student suite which is currently let out. The property has a secure card entry system & includes a modern-fitted en-suite shower room with access to a communal social living area. ..."
"Mann Countrywide are delighted to welcome this one bedroom student suite which is currently let out. The property has a secure card entry system & includes a modern-fitted en-suite shower room with access to a communal social living area. Externally, there are communal gardens. This prop..."
"*Currently Let* One Bedroom STUDENT POD, located within the student village of Parham Road. This pod has secure card access & includes a SHOWER ROOM with access to a communal kitchen and social living area. NO ONWARD CHAIN."
"Studio Apartment in the well known STUDENT ACCOMMODATION development of Parham Road. Comprising of a bedroom/ living area & private en suite shower room. Also providing access to communal kitchen, living space & laundry areas. Within close proximity of local amenities, transport links & city centre."
VIDEO TOUR AVAILABLE | CONTACT MANN COUNTRYWIDE FOR VIRTUAL VIEWING. FANTASTIC INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. Mann Countrywide are delighted to welcome this one bedroom student suite which is currently let out. The property has a secure card entry system & includes a modern-fitted e...
"A pod in the STUDENT VILLAGE ON PARHAM ROAD close to amenities including shops and restaurants. The property offers a double bedroom as well as a private shower room with shower cubicle, WC and wash basin. There are also communal kitchen and social facilities. No onward chain & tenant in situ."
An ideal one bedroom studio situated in the Canterbury Student Village at the highly desirable Kentish House. This one bedroom classic en suite offers its self as great investment
"A well presented STUDIO apartment set in a well maintained and fully managed block in the Parham Road student village in Canterbury. Positioned close to local amenities, the property comprises a bedroom with en suite shower room and full use of communal areas such as kitchen and social lounge."
"***Guide Price £40,000 - £45,000*** Mann Countrywide are delighted to welcome this one bedroom student suite which is currently let out. The property has a secure card entry system & includes a modern-fitted en-suite shower room with access to a communal social living area. E..."
Call Your Move to view this student residence offered with no forward chain. Block Energy Rating - Grade A. Lease 250 yrs from July 2014. GR/Maintenance £942 per annum. Council tax TBC
"Mann Countrywide are delighted to welcome this chain-free one bedroom student suite which is currently let out. The property has a secure card entry system & includes a modern-fitted en-suite shower room with access to a communal social living area. Externally, there are communal gardens. "
"A purpose built block within a student village close to Canterbury City Centre. The property comprises a bedroom area and en suite shower room. There are communal areas within a lounge, kitchen and laundry. An ideal investment property with on site management team to find and look after tenants."
"***Guide Price: £30,000*** Mann Countrywide are delighted to welcome this one bedroom student suite which is currently let out. The property has a secure card entry system & includes a modern-fitted en-suite shower room with access to a communal social living area. Externally..."
SINGLE GARAGE FOR SALEMiles and Barr are delighted to offer to the market this single garage in a very central location.
Miles and Barr are delighted to present to the market this single garage in the ever so popular south Canterbury location of Raymond Avenue. The garage is situated just a short walk from the City Centre and the Hospital.
"SINGLE GARAGE EN BLOC, located on the Hales Place Estate in Canterbury. This brick built garage comes with an up and over door. Call to find out more and book your viewing."
"AUCTION SALE 18 April 2023 - Freehold Site extending to approx. 1,030 sq ft, Future Development Opportunity (stpp), Full Vacant Possession, TO SELL YOUR PROPERTY IN OUR NEXT AUCTION CALL US NOW"
